Massachusetts, session 194th, S1117.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 87A of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following paragraphs:-
Upon motion by a person who has been ordered to submit to drug or alcohol testing or to
refrain from the use of alcohol or a controlled substance as a condition of probation, the court
shall consider whether the person has an alcohol or substance use disorder and needs treatment.
If the person attests to having or is determined to have an alcohol or substance use
disorder, the person shall be ordered to engage in a treatment plan or protocol: (i) with a mental
health clinic or alcohol or substance use disorder program licensed by the department of public
health under chapters 17, 111, 111B, or 111E; (ii) with a behavioral, alcohol use disorder,
of 2

substance use disorder, or mental health professional who is licensed under chapters 111J and
112 and accredited or certified to provide services consistent with law; (iii) with a primary care
provider or mental health care provider prescribing medication for alcohol or substance use
disorder; or (iv) that aligns with evidence-based practices described in the American Society of
Addiction Medicine or the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration. If the
person is engaged in such treatment plan or protocol, the court shall not modify such treatment
plan or protocol or require the person to submit to additional drug or alcohol testing that is not
required by the treatment plan or protocol.
A positive drug or alcohol test or other indicator of relapse shall not be considered a
violation of the conditions of probation if the person: (i) is engaged in a treatment plan or
protocol; (ii) is making reasonable efforts to receive treatment; (iii) is switching treatment plans
or protocols voluntarily or at the direction of a treatment provider; (iv) is discharged from a
treatment plan or protocol and transitioning into new a treatment plan or protocol; or (v) has
completed a treatment plan or protocol and remains in compliance with all other conditions of
probation.
If a person who has completed a treatment plan or protocol and remains subject to
conditions of probation tests positive for drugs or alcohol or exhibits any other indicator of
relapse, the person may again move the court to consider the person’s treatment needs and, if
necessary, the court may order further treatment consistent with this section.
of 2